Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Chapter 2

Bills, Resolutions, and Orders

3-2-101. Engrossment and enrollment.

All bills and resolutions of the general assembly shall be engrossed or enrolled in type, or on a typewriter, by the engrossing clerks, and a copy made at the time and furnished the secretary of state.

Acts 1923, ch. 3, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 226a1; Code 1932, § 167; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-201.

Cross-References. Bills submitted by Code commission, §1-1-114.

Distribution of acts, §§12-6-101 —12-6-105.

Effect of repeal of statute, §1-3-101.

General appropriation bill, §9-4-5108.

Publication of Tennessee Code Annotated, §§1-1-105 —1-1-115.

Supervision of state printing, §12-5-102.

3-2-102. Presentation to governor.

Every bill, joint resolution, or order, except on questions of adjournment and proposals of specific amendments to the Constitution of Tennessee, shall, after the same has been passed, enrolled, and signed by the speakers of both houses of the general assembly, be presented by the committee on enrolled bills of that house wherein such bill, joint resolution, or order originated, to the governor for signature.

The committee shall report that they have presented the bill, joint resolution, or order to the governor for signature, and the date of such presentation, which report shall be entered on the journal of that house to which such committee belongs.

No bill, joint resolution, or order shall be presented to the governor until the time for moving for a reconsideration shall have expired, unless expressly ordered by that house wherein such bill, joint resolution, or order originated.

The speaker of the senate shall first sign all bills and joint resolutions originating in the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives shall first sign all bills and joint resolutions originating in the house of representatives.

Acts 1871, ch. 139, § 1; Shan., § 227; Code 1932, § 168 (as mod. by 1953 amend., Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-202.

Cross-References. Presentation of bills to governor, Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

Collateral References.

Propriety of using census data as basis for governmental regulations or activities—state cases. 56 A.L.R.5th 171.

3-2-103. Approval of governor.

If the governor approves the bill, joint resolution, or order, the governor shall write upon the same, to the left of and below the signatures of the speakers of the two (2) houses, the fact and date of approval, as follows: “Approved , 20 ,” and shall sign the same as follows: “ , Governor.”

Acts 1871, ch. 139, § 3; Shan., § 229; Code 1932, § 170; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-203.

3-2-104. Failure of governor to return.

If, while the general assembly remains in session, the governor fails to return any bill, joint resolution, or order, with objections, within ten (10) days (Sundays excepted) after it has been presented to the governor, it shall be the duty of the committee on enrolled bills of that house wherein such bill, joint resolution, or order originated to cause the bill, joint resolution, or order forthwith to be reenrolled; and the same shall thereupon be signed by the respective speakers of each house, who shall annex and sign the following certificate:

This bill (joint resolution or order) having been presented to the governor for signature on the day of , and the governor having failed to return it within the time prescribed by law, the same is hereby declared to have become a law (or, in case of a joint resolution or order, the same is hereby declared to have taken effect).

This day of , 20 .

Speaker of the House of Representatives.

Speaker of the Senate.

Acts 1871, ch. 139, § 2; Shan., § 228; Code 1932, § 169 (as mod. by 1953 and 1978 amend., Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18); Acts 1979, ch. 25, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-204.

Cross-References. Failure of governor to return signed bill, Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.

3-2-105. Filing with secretary of state.

When any bill, joint resolution, or order has been returned duly signed by the governor, or has passed over the governor's veto, or shall otherwise become a law, the committee on enrolled bills of that house wherein such bill, joint resolution, or order originated, shall forthwith file the same in the office of the secretary of state, and shall report the fact and date of such filing, which report shall be entered upon the journal.

Acts 1871, ch. 139, § 4; Shan., § 230; Code 1932, § 171; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-205.

Cross-References. Preservation and publication of acts by secretary of state, §8-3-104.

3-2-106. Preservation of original acts.

The original acts and resolutions passed by the general assembly, and enrolled and filed in the office of the secretary of state, shall be bound together and preserved in that form in that office, and the secretary of state shall cause the same to be done.

Code 1858, § 163 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 123, § 1); Shan., § 226; Code 1932, § 166; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 3-206.

Cross-References. Binding and preservation of enrolled acts and resolutions, §8-3-104.

Enrolled draft of Tennessee Code, §1-2-102.

3-2-107. Fiscal notes for revenue bills — Cumulative fiscal notes during session — Comparison of actual fiscal impact — Written summary.

Fiscal notes shall be provided for all general bills or resolutions increasing or decreasing state or local revenues, making sum-sufficient appropriations, or increasing or decreasing existing appropriations or the fiscal liability of the state or of the local governments of the state. Upon a standing committee of either house placing such bill or resolution on the committee's calendar for action, the fiscal review committee shall furnish to the chief clerk of the house or houses of introduction a statement of analysis of the fiscal effect of such bill or resolution and shall prepare and distribute copies of the statement to members of the general assembly. Within twenty-four (24) hours following a request by the sponsor of an amendment to any pending measure on which a fiscal note is required by this section, the fiscal review committee shall prepare for the sponsor a fiscal note showing what effect the amendment would have on the estimates made in the fiscal note which applies to the bill or resolution. In regard to any bill or resolution affecting local government, the office of the comptroller of the treasury is directed to provide to the fiscal review committee, upon request, the information necessary to determine the fiscal effect of such bill or resolution.

The fiscal note shall, if possible, include an estimate in dollars of the anticipated change in revenue, expenditures, or fiscal liability under the provisions of the bill or resolution. It shall also include a statement as to the immediate effect and, if determinable or reasonably foreseeable, the long-range effect of the measure. If, after careful investigation, it is determined that no dollar estimate is possible, the note shall contain a statement to that effect, setting forth the reasons why no dollar estimate can be given. The fiscal note statement shall include an explanation of the basis or reasoning on which the estimate is founded, including any assumptions involved.

The fiscal note shall also include a statement as to the immediate effect and, if determinable or reasonably foreseeable, the long-range effect on commerce and jobs in this state. Such impact to commerce statement shall also include, if possible, an estimate in dollars of the anticipated change in costs or savings to commerce under the bill or resolution.

Beginning January 1, 2014, impact to commerce statements shall be required for general bills or resolutions referred to the following standing committees:

Commerce committee of the house of representatives;

Insurance committee of the house of representatives; and

Commerce and labor committee of the senate.

No comment or opinion shall be included in the fiscal note regarding the merits of the measure for which the note is prepared; however, technical or mechanical defects may be noted.

A cumulative fiscal note shall be prepared weekly by the fiscal review committee and a copy shall be distributed to each member of the general assembly each week while the general assembly is in session. The cumulative fiscal note shall show the cumulative increase or decrease of revenue or expenditures as caused by legislation enacted from the beginning of the session then convened.

Within ninety (90) days after the conclusion of each annual regular legislative session, the fiscal review committee staff shall select a fair and representative sample of at least five (5) public chapters enacted within the preceding five (5) years and compare the actual fiscal impact of each public chapter to the fiscal impact as stated in the cumulative fiscal note.

Upon completing the review, the fiscal review committee staff shall present the results of this review to the fiscal review committee at a meeting of the committee. The committee may also invite testimony from other witnesses, including representatives of executive departments and agencies affected by the bill. A written summary of the results of such review shall be provided to each member of the general assembly each year.

Acts 1963, ch. 113, § 1; 1965, ch. 156, §§ 1, 2; 1967, ch. 209, § 1; 1969, ch. 92, § 1; 1974, ch. 539, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 89, § 20; T.C.A., § 3-207; Acts 2010, ch. 824, § 1; 2010, ch. 868, § 1; 2011, ch. 349, § 1; 2013, ch. 446, § 1; 2016, ch. 708, § 1; 2017, ch. 110, §§ 1, 2; 2019, ch. 345, § 4.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment substituted “ninety (90) days” for “sixty (60) days” at the beginning of (c)(1).

The 2017 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “Upon a standing committee of either house placing such bill or resolution on the committee's calendar for action,” for “Not more than ten (10) days following the introduction of any such bill or resolution,” at the beginning of the second sentence, and deleted the former third sentence which read: “Within ten (10) days following receipt of a request from a member of the general assembly for a fiscal note on any proposed bill or resolution requiring a fiscal note, the fiscal review committee shall prepare a fiscal note statement to accompany such proposal at the time of introduction.”

The 2019 amendment, in (a)(2)(B)(ii)(a), substituted “Commerce” for “Business and utilities”; and in (a)(2)(B)(ii)(b), deleted “and banking” following “Insurance”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 708, § 2. April 6, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 110, § 3. April 7, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Fiscal review committee, title 3, ch. 7.

3-2-108. Prefiling bills or resolutions — Time — Manner.

At the times specified in this section and § 3-2-109, members of the general assembly are hereby authorized to prefile legislative bills and resolutions for introduction in the next succeeding regular legislative session.

Bills and resolutions may be prefiled at the following times:

In the case of both senators and representatives, from the time that a member-elect has received the certificate of election until the next succeeding regular legislative session;

In the case of both senators and representatives, from the adjournment of the regular legislative session in odd-numbered years until the convening of the regular legislative session in even-numbered years; and

In the case of senators, from the date of each general election of representatives at which senators are not regularly elected until the next succeeding regular legislative session.

Bills and resolutions which are prefiled under this section and § 3-2-109 shall be in such final and correct form for introduction in the general assembly as is required by the constitution, laws, and rules of the respective houses of the general assembly.

The original copy of every bill and resolution prefiled shall be inspected by an attorney for the legislative drafting service.

Any bill or resolution prefiled under this section and § 3-2-109 shall be mailed to the chief clerk of either house by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, or by personal delivery by a member of the general assembly who is one of the authors of the bill or resolution, and in the case of personal delivery the office of the chief clerk of either house shall deliver a signed receipt therefor to such author.

Any standing committee may prefile any bill or resolution at any time when a senator or representative is authorized to prefile bills and resolutions under this section. Bills or resolutions filed under authority of this subsection (f) shall be filed by the chair or vice chair of the standing committee in the same manner as such chair or vice chair would prefile a bill of which such person was the author, or in the event neither the chair nor vice chair desires to sign the bill any member of the committee voting with the majority of the committee may introduce it. Before prefiling any bill or resolution under authority of this subsection (f), the chair or vice chair shall be authorized to make such prefiling by a majority vote of the members of the committee.

The chief clerk of either the senate or the house of representatives shall number the bill or resolution and note thereon the date of the prefiling and the date of the first day of the next session of the general assembly on which it will be first considered and passed. The procedures for printing and distribution shall be the same for prefiled bills and resolutions as if the general assembly were in regular session.

Acts 1975, ch. 107, § 1; 1979, ch. 26, § 1; T.C.A., § 3-208.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

3-2-109. Placing prefiled bill or resolution on calendar — Effect of procedural defects.

Immediately upon the convening of the next succeeding regular session of the general assembly, all bills and resolutions prefiled in accordance with § 3-2-108 and this section shall be deemed properly introduced and shall be placed upon the calendar on the first legislative day for first consideration and passage in the same manner as bills and resolutions introduced after the convening of the general assembly.

When any prefiled bill or resolution is placed on the calendar for first consideration and the same is passed, any prior failure to comply with any of the procedural requirements of § 3-2-108 and this section shall have no effect on the validity of such bill or resolution.

Acts 1975, ch. 107, § 2; 1979, ch. 26, § 2; T.C.A., § 3-209.

3-2-110. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §3-2-110 (Acts 1979, ch. 270, § 1; T.C.A., § 3-210; Acts 1983, ch. 429, § 18), concerning energy impact assessments, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 106, § 6, effective April 27, 2009.

3-2-111. Bills concerning health coverage — Impact notes and statements.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Health insurance issuer” means any entity subject to the insurance laws of this state or subject to the jurisdiction of the department of commerce and insurance that contracts or offers to contract to provide health insurance coverage including, but not limited to, an insurance company, a health maintenance organization, or a non-profit hospital and medical service corporation; and

“Mandated health benefit” means a benefit or coverage that is proposed to be required by law or that is required by law to be offered or provided by a health insurance issuer including, but not limited to, coverage for or the offering of specific health care services, treatments, diagnostic tests or practices.

As of January 2, 2005, upon the completion of all bill filing deadlines each year in both the house of representatives and senate of the general assembly, legislation containing a mandated health benefit shall be referred to the fiscal review committee in order that it may evaluate the legislation's potential impact on the cost of health insurance premiums.

To the extent that resources are otherwise available, the fiscal review committee may conduct research; receive testimony of experts including advocates of such mandated benefits; receive technical assistance from health insurance issuers; review for purposes of comparison, the mandated health benefits upon health insurance issuers in other states and jurisdictions and the effects of such mandates; and take other actions it determines appropriate for the completion of the assigned tasks. The fiscal review committee may receive pertinent data from health insurance issuers and from advocates of mandated benefits. Notwithstanding title 10, chapter 7, part 1, such data will be held as confidential by the fiscal review committee.

The fiscal review committee may draw on existing expertise within the departments of health, commerce and insurance, finance and administration, the TennCare bureau, and any other state agency or official, to perform these functions. If the fiscal review committee determines that additional resources are needed to evaluate fully a proposal, such request shall be directed to the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and house of representatives for consideration of funding as an amendment to the general appropriations act.

The fiscal review committee shall, no later than March 15 of the year in which the legislation is filed, attach to such legislation a statement on the proposed mandated benefit's impact on the premiums for health insurance coverage in Tennessee, especially for employees of companies employing fewer than fifty (50) employees. If the impact cannot be reasonably determined without additional resources, a statement to that effect, including the amount of additional resources needed, shall be included. The impact statement shall be available for the appropriate legislative committee when considering such proposal.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any health insurance issuer from voluntarily expanding or eliminating coverage nor to prohibit any individual or employer from electing to expand or eliminate coverage on any health maintenance organization contract or individual or group health insurance policy or contract covering the individual, the employer or employees of the employer, as applicable.

[Deleted by 2015 amendment.]

Acts 1989, ch. 244, § 2; 2004, ch. 640, § 1; 2015, ch. 123, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1989, ch. 244, § 1 provided:

“The general assembly takes notice of the increasing number of legislative proposals to mandate certain health coverages or offering of health coverages by insurance carriers, health care service contractors, and health maintenance organizations as a component of individual or group policies. Improved access to these health care services to segments of the population which desire them can provide beneficial social and health consequences which may be in the public interest.

“However, the cost ramifications of expanding health coverages is resulting in a growing concern. The way that such coverages are structured and the steps taken to create incentives to provide cost-effective services or to take advantage of cost off-setting features of services can significantly influence the cost impact of mandating particular coverages.

“The merits of a particular coverage mandate must be balanced against a variety of consequences which may go far beyond the immediate impact upon the cost of insurance coverage. The general assembly finds and declares that a systematic review of proposed mandated or mandatorily-offered health coverage, which explores all the ramifications of such proposed legislation, will assist the legislature in determining whether mandating a particular coverage or offering is in the public interest and that a set of guidelines for all legislation proposing such mandated coverage is needed in the consideration and evaluation of such proposals.”

Acts 1989, ch. 244, § 3 provided that the provisions of ch. 244 shall apply to all legislation which is introduced in either house after May 9, 1989, and that such impact notes shall be required for any such legislative proposals considered by the general assembly in the 1990 session notwithstanding the date of introduction.

Acts 2004, ch. 640, § 2 provided that the fiscal review committee shall perform its duties under the act within its existing budgeted resources unless additional resources are provided in the general appropriations act.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment deleted (c), which read: “(c)(1) The fiscal review committee is encouraged to inquire into and make recommendations with respect to the costs of:“(A) Each and every state and federally mandated health benefit placed upon health insurance issuers in Tennessee since 1990; and“(B) The impact of each such mandated health benefit on the premiums for health insurance coverage in Tennessee, especially on employees of companies with fewer than fifty (50) employees.“(2) In accordance with this subsection (c), the fiscal review committee is encouraged to make a final report with recommendations to the general assembly no later than January 1, 2006.“(3) The fiscal review committee may draw on existing expertise within the departments of health, commerce and insurance, finance and administration, the TennCare bureau, and any other state agency or official, to perform these functions. If the fiscal review committee determines that additional resources are needed to evaluate fully a proposal, such request shall be directed to the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and house of representatives for consideration of funding as an amendment to the general appropriations act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 123, § 6. April 10, 2015.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

3-2-112. Denomination of highways and public structures, facilities or property — Legislative action.

Neither the senate nor the house of representatives shall take formal action to give a name to or to rename any road, highway, interstate highway, bridge, overpass or other public structure, facility or property unless such action shall be accomplished through enactment of legislation or adoption of a joint resolution.

Any such action taken in violation of this section shall be void and shall have no effect.

Acts 1991, ch. 17, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. If the general assembly chooses to exercise its authority to rename a public street or highway, its actions are controlling, OAG 06-054 (3/28/06).